New York, session 2025-2026, S3363.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 4 of section 4141 of the 2 public health law, as amended by chapter 153 of the laws of 2011, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (a) The medical certificate shall be made, dated, and signed by the 5 physician or nurse practitioner, if any, last in attendance on the 6 deceased, or the hospice medical director or a physician designated by 7 such director. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05347-01-5